Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 11. Accidents

Cross references. —

As to motor vehicle division keeping accident reports and records, see §

31-7-120

.

As to suspension of licenses and registrations in regard to accidents, see §

31-9-202

et seq.

As to reports of accidents by public utilities, see §

37-2-203

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

7A Am. Jur. 2d Automobiles and Highway Traffic §§ 349 to 409.

Violation of statute requiring one involved in an accident to stop and render aid as affecting civil liability, 80 ALR2d 299.

Necessity and sufficiency of showing in a criminal prosecution under a “hit-and-run” statute accused's knowledge of accident, injury or damage, 23 ALR3d 497.

Sufficiency of compliance with requirement of criminal “hit and run” statute that motorist identify himself, 48 ALR3d 685.

Sufficiency of showing of driver's involvement in motor vehicle accident to support prosecution for failure to stop, furnish identification or render aid, 82 ALR4th 232.

Necessity and sufficiency of showing, in criminal prosecution under “hit-and-run” statute, accused's knowledge of accident, injury or damage, 26 ALR5th 1.

No-fault insurance coverage for injury or death of insured occurring during carjacking or attempted carjacking, 42 ALR5th 727.

60 C.J.S. Motor Vehicles § 41; 61A C.J.S. Motor Vehicles §§ 1456 to 1485, 1488 to 1504.

§ 31-5-1101.
Duty to stop vehicle where accident involves death or personal injuries; penalties.

The driver of any vehicle involved in an accident resulting in injury to or death of any person shall immediately stop the vehicle at the scene of the accident or as close thereto as possible but shall then forthwith return to and in every event shall remain at the scene of the accident until he has fulfilled the requirements of W.S.

31-5-1103

. Every stop shall be made without obstructing traffic more than is necessary.

Any person failing to stop or to comply with subsection (a) of this section shall, upon conviction, be imprisoned not more than one (1) year, fined not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 20; C.S. 1945, § 60-620; W.S. 1957, § 31-218; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Elements of this section

are: (1) driving a vehicle; (2) involvement of the vehicle in an accident with another vehicle; and (3) failing to stop at the scene of the accident, furnish identification and render assistance. Huber v. Casper, 727 P.2d 1002,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 635

(Wyo. 1986) (construing similar city ordinance).

License not revoked for conviction under municipal ordinance.—

The legislature did not intend that a person's driver's license would be revoked under §

31-7-127

when he is convicted of failing to stop and render aid under a municipal ordinance, even though such a revocation is the result of a conviction under this section. State ex rel. Department of Revenue & Taxation, Motor Vehicle Div. v. McNeese, 718 P.2d 38,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 531

(Wyo. 1986).

Quoted

in

Armijo v. State, 678 P.2d 864,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 268

(Wyo. 1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction and application of “amnesty” provision whereby automobile driver leaving scene of accident may report to police within stated time without risk of use of his report against him, 36 ALR4th 907.

§ 31-5-1102.
Duty to stop vehicle where accident involves damage to attended vehicle or property; penalty.

The driver of a vehicle involved in an accident resulting only in damage to a vehicle or other property which is driven or attended by any person shall immediately stop the vehicle at the scene of the accident or as close thereto as possible, but shall forthwith return to and remain at the scene of the accident until he has fulfilled the requirements of W.S.

31-5-1103

. Every stop shall be made without obstructing traffic more than is necessary. Any person failing to stop or comply with this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 21; C.S. 1945, § 60-621; W.S. 1957, § 31-219; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Evidence sufficient for conviction. —

See Wood v. Casper, 683 P.2d 1147,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 307

(Wyo. 1984).

Cited

in

Wyoming Intermediate Appeals. Wood v. City of Casper, 660 P.2d 1163,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 302

(Wyo. 1983).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction and application of “amnesty” provision whereby automobile driver leaving scene of accident may report to police within stated time without risk of use of his report against him, 36 ALR4th 907.

§ 31-5-1103.
Duty to give information and render aid.

The driver of any vehicle involved in an accident resulting in injury to or death of any person or damage to any vehicle or other property which is driven or attended by any person shall give his name, address and the registration number of the vehicle he is driving and shall upon request and if available exhibit his driver’s license to the person injured in the accident or to the driver or occupant of or person attending any vehicle or other property damaged in the accident and to any police officer at the scene of or who is investigating the accident. The driver shall also render to any person injured in the accident reasonable assistance, including the carrying, or the making of arrangements for the carrying, of the person to a physician, surgeon or hospital for medical or surgical treatment if it is apparent that the treatment is necessary or if the carrying is requested by the injured person.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 22; C.S. 1945, § 60-622; W.S. 1957, § 31-220; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to duty to carry driver's license, see §

31-7-116

.

As to mandatory revocation of driver's license or operating privilege upon conviction of failure to stop and render aid, see § 31-7-127(a)(iv).

Stated

in

Wood v. City of Casper, 683 P.2d 1147,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 307

(Wyo. 1984).

§ 31-5-1104.
Duty upon colliding with unattended vehicle or property.

The driver of any vehicle which collides with or is involved in an accident with any vehicle or other property which is unattended resulting in any damage to the other vehicle or other property shall immediately stop and shall immediately either locate and notify the operator or owner of the vehicle or other property of his name, address and the registration number of the vehicle he is driving or shall attach securely in a conspicuous place in or on the vehicle or other property a written notice giving his name, address and the registration number of the vehicle he is driving. Every stop shall be made without obstructing traffic more than is necessary.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 23; C.S. 1945, § 60-623; W.S. 1957, § 31-221; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Section inapplicable to duty to other motorists. —

This section pertains to striking an unattended vehicle or property, and it relates to the driver's duty to the owner of that vehicle or property, and does not relate to his duty to warn other motorists of highway conditions. Haderlie v. Sondgeroth, 866 P.2d 703,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1993).

Cited in

Bd. of Prof'l Responsibility v. Haderlie, 2015 WY 90,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(July 2, 2015).

§ 31-5-1105.
Notice required of driver.

The driver of a vehicle involved in an accident resulting in injury to or death of any person, in property damage to another or others to an apparent extent of at least one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or in any vehicle, excluding bicycles or any other vehicle moved solely by human power, becoming so disabled as to prevent its normal and safe operation, shall immediately by the quickest means of communication give notice of the accident to the local police department if the accident occurs within a municipality, otherwise to the nearest office of the state highway patrol or to the office of the county sheriff.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 25; C.S. 1945, § 60-625; W.S. 1957, § 31-223; Laws 1971, ch. 69, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

31-5-1106

; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 1999, ch. 51, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to highway patrol division, see §

24-12-101

.

§ 31-5-1106.
Written reports required of police officers; reporting of vehicles struck by bullets.

and (b) Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 102, § 3.

Every police officer who investigates a motor vehicle accident resulting in bodily injury to or death of any person or total property damage to an apparent extent of one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or more, either at the time of and at the scene of the accident or thereafter by interviewing the participants or witnesses shall forward a written report of the accident to the highway department within ten (10) days after his investigation of the accident.

The person in charge of any garage or repair shop to which is brought any motor vehicle which shows evidence of having been struck by any bullet, shall report to the local police department if the garage is located within a municipality, otherwise to the county sheriff or nearest office of the state highway patrol, within twenty-four (24) hours after the motor vehicle is received by the garage or repair shop, giving the identifying number, registration number and the name and address of the owner or driver of the vehicle.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 26; C.S. 1945, § 60-626; W.S. 1957, § 31-224; Laws 1971, ch. 69, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

31-5-1107

; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 1999, ch. 51, § 1; 2013 ch. 102, §§ 2, 3, effective July 1, 2013.

Cross references. —

As to highway patrol division, see §

24-12-101

.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, repealed former (a) and (b), which read: “(a) The driver of a vehicle which is involved in an accident resulting in bodily injury to or death of any person or total property damage to an apparent extent of one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or more shall, within ten (10) days after the accident, forward a written report of the accident to the highway department. (b) The department may require any driver of a vehicle involved in an accident of which report must be made as provided in this section to file supplemental reports whenever the original report is insufficient in the opinion of the department.” and substituted “resulting in bodily injury to or death of any person or total property damage to an apparent extent of one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or more” for “of which report must be made as required in this section” in (c).

§ 31-5-1107.
Duty of occupant and owner when driver incapable of reporting.

Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 102, § 3.

Whenever the driver of a vehicle is physically incapable of giving an immediate notice of an accident as required in W.S.

31-5-1105

and there was another occupant in the vehicle at the time of the accident capable of doing so, the occupant shall make or cause to be given the notice not given by the driver.

Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 102, § 3.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 27; C.S. 1945, § 60-627; W.S. 1957, § 31-225; W.S. 1977, §

31-5-1108

; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 2013 ch. 102, § 3, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, repealed former (a) and (c), which read: “(a) An accident report is not required under W.S.

31-5-1106

from any person who is physically incapable of making report during the period of incapacity. (c) Whenever the driver is physically incapable of making a written report of an accident as required in W.S.

31-5-1106

and the driver is not the owner of the vehicle, then the owner of the vehicle involved in the accident shall within ten (10) days after the accident make the report not made by the driver.”

§ 31-5-1108.
Report forms; failure to make report; false report.

The highway department shall prepare and upon request supply to police departments, coroners, sheriffs and other suitable agencies or individuals, forms for accident reports required hereunder, appropriate with respect to the persons required to make the reports and the purposes to be served. The written reports to be made by investigating officers shall call for sufficiently detailed information to disclose with reference to a traffic accident the cause, conditions then existing and the persons and vehicles involved.

Every accident report required to be made in writing shall be made on the appropriate form approved by the highway department and shall contain all of the information required therein unless not available.

Every accident report shall also contain information sufficient to enable the department to determine whether the requirements for the deposit of security under any of the laws of this state are inapplicable by reason of the existence of insurance or other exceptions specified therein.

Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 102, § 3.

A person shall not give information in oral or written reports as required in W.S.

31-5-1101

through

31-5-1111

knowing or having reason to believe that the information is false.

History.

Laws 1955, ch 225, §§ 28, 29; C.S. 1945, § 60-629; W.S. 1957, §§ 31-226, 31-227; W.S. 1977, §§

31-5-1109

,

31-5-1110

; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 2013 ch. 102, §§ 2, 3, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, deleted “persons involved in accidents and by” in the second sentence in (a); and repealed former (d), which read: “Any person convicted of failing to make a report as required herein shall be punished as provided in W.S.

31-5-1201

.”.

§ 31-5-1109.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 212, § 4.

Cross references. —

As to coroner's inquests, see §

7-4-201

et seq.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 30, related to coroner's reports.

§ 31-5-1110.
Confidentiality of supplemental information to reports; ;use of reports as evidence; exceptions.

Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 102, § 3.

Supplemental information to a crash report filed in connection with the administration of the laws of this state relating to the deposit of security or proof of financial responsibility shall be confidential and not open to general public inspection. The supplemental information may be examined by any person named therein or by his representative designated in writing.

No written reports forwarded under this section shall be used as evidence in any trial, civil or criminal, arising out of a crash except for prosecutions for filing false reports and, except that the highway department shall furnish upon demand of any party to the trial, or upon demand of any court, a certificate showing that a specified crash report has or has not been made to the highway department in compliance with law, and, if a report has been made, the date, time and location of the crash, the names and addresses of the drivers, the owners of the vehicles involved and the investigating officers.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 31; C.S. 1945, § 60-631; W.S. 1957, § 31-229; W.S. 1977, §

31-5-1112

; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 2000, ch. 62, § 1; 2013 ch. 102, § 3, effective July 1, 2013; 2017 ch. 174, § 1, effective March 6, 2017.

Cross references. —

As to use of report as evidence, see §

31-9-209

.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, repealed former (a), which read: “(a) All accident reports made by persons involved in accidents shall be without prejudice to the individual so reporting and shall be for the confidential use of the department or other state agencies having use for the records for accident prevention purposes, except that: (i) The highway department may disclose the identity of a person involved in an accident when the identity is not otherwise known or when the person denies his presence at the accident; (ii) The highway department shall disclose to any person requesting such information whether any person or vehicle was covered by a vehicle insurance policy and the name of the insurer.”

The 2017 amendment at the beginning of (b) substituted “Supplemental information to a crash report” for “All accident reports and supplemental information,” deleted “nor shall copying of lists of reports be permitted except” from the end of the current first sentence, deleted “reports and” from the beginning of the current last sentence, and made related changes; in (c) substituted “a crash” for “an accident” or variants thrice.

Laws 2017, ch. 174, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 6, 2017.

Stated

in

Wyoming Farm Bureau Mut. Ins. Co. v. May, 434 P.2d 507,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 187

(Wyo. 1967).

Law reviews. —

For note, “Admissibility of Testimony Re Facts Included in Confidential Accident Reports,” see 11 Wyo. L.J. 99.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Discoverability of traffic accident reports and derivative information, 84 ALR4th 15.

§ 31-5-1111.
Reports required by municipalities.

Any municipality may by ordinance require that the driver of a vehicle involved in a crash, or the owner of the vehicle, shall file with a designated city department a report of the crash or a copy of any report herein required to be filed with the highway department. All reports shall be subject to W.S.

31-5-1110

. Any crash report required of persons involved in crashes shall be without prejudice to the individual so reporting.

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 174, § 2.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 33; C.S. 1945, § 60-633; W.S. 1957, § 31-231; W.S. 1977, § 31-5-1114; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 2013 ch. 102, § 2, effective July 1, 2013; 2017 ch. 174, §§
1, 2, effective March 6, 2017.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added the last sentence in the introductory paragraph in (a); and added (a)(i) and (a)(ii).

The 2017 amendments. —

The first
2017 amendment by ch. 174, § 1, in (a) substituted “a crash” for “an accident” or variants throughout the subsection, deleted “for the confidential use of the city department and” from the middle of the second sentence; and deleted “an shall be for the confidential use of the municipality for the accident prevention purposes, except that:,” from the end of the last sentence.

The second
2017 amendment, by ch. 174, § 2, repealed (a)(i) and (a)(ii).

Laws 2017, ch. 174, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 6, 2017.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 31-5-1112.
Tabulation and analysis of reports.

The department shall tabulate and may analyze all accident reports and shall publish annually, or at more frequent intervals, statistical information based thereon as to the number and circumstances of traffic accidents.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 32; C.S. 1945, § 60-632; W.S. 1957, § 31-230; W.S. 1977, § 31-5-1113.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1984, ch. 48 renumbered and amended all of chapter 5 of title 31, but failed to account for former § 31-5-1113. It has been set out above without any substantive changes but has been renumbered for numerical continuity with the amended provisions.